Maine, session 132, LD1106.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Accountability and reporting. The Maine State Housing Authority shall
submit a detailed report regarding the conversion of the Island Nursing Home in Hancock
County to apartments for individuals 55 years of age or older whose household income
does not exceed 80% of the median income for the area as defined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development under the United States Housing Act of
1937, Public Law 75-412, 50 Stat. 888, Section 8, as amended, to the Joint Standing
Committee on Appropriations and Financial Affairs within 12 months of receipt of funding
provided pursuant to section 2. The report must include:
1. A breakdown of how the funds have been used;
2. A progress update; and
3. A financial summary of additional funds raised and any additional funding needs.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to support the conversion of the Island Nursing Home
in Hancock County into 24 apartments for eligible individuals 55 years of age or older.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $250,000
Page 1 - 132LR1918(05)